Massachusetts, session 194th, S1978.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after clause Nineteenth the following clause:- 
Fifty-ninth. Merchandise situated in Massachusetts, including inventory held for sale; 
finished goods; products, goods, wares or stock in trade; work in progress; materials or supplies; 
and archived or stored goods.